Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1446
Reserve peace officers; procedure for appointment.

Sections 81-1438 to 81-1446 shall constitute the only procedure for the appointment of reserve peace officers. Any power granted by other provisions of law to local governing bodies or public officials for the appointment of special deputies, special officers, or special police is of no effect and is hereby repealed.

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 9.